Utah statutes.
17-33-14.   Violations -- Misdemeanor -- Ineligibility for employment and
forfeiture of position.
(1)  Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter or the
rules and regulations promulgated under it is guilty of a class  A
misdemeanor.
(2)  Any person who has been adjudged guilty of violating any of the
provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under it
shall, for a period of five years, in addition to the sanctions of Subsection
(1), be ineligible for appointment to or employment in a position in the
county service, and if an officer or employee of the county, shall forfeit
that office or position.
